Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-753
Personal
jurisdiction; when.

Application for a license as a mortgage
banker, for registration as a mortgage
banker, or for a license as a mortgage loan originator pursuant
to the Residential
Mortgage Licensing Act shall constitute sufficient contact with
this state for the exercise of personal jurisdiction in any action arising
under the act.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 23;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 45-720;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 38.